District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Anacostia Business Improvement District Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 10 of the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29,
1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.09), is amended by adding a new
subsection (d) to read as follows:
“(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the Mayor may approve a petition
by the Anacostia BID to expand its geographic area to include real property owned by the
District of Columbia adjacent to or abutting the Anacostia BID’s geographical area as delineated
in section 209; provided, that the expanded BID’s geographic area shall not become effective
until the effective date of an act of the Council approving such BID geographic expansion; and
provided further, that initial BID taxes for such expanded area, to the extent it includes taxable
property, shall be collected at the next practicable regularly scheduled billing pursuant to section
16.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D. C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2